South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3076.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 63-3-620 of the S.C. Code is amended to read: Section 63-3-620.  An adult who wilfully violates, neglects, or refuses to obey or perform a lawful order of the court, or who violates any provision of this chapter, may be proceeded against for contempt of court. An adult found in contempt of court may be punished by a fine, by a public works sentence, or by imprisonment in a local detention facility, or by any combination of them, in the discretion of the court, but not to exceed imprisonment in a local detention facility for one year, a fine of fifteen hundred dollars, or public works sentence of more than three hundred hours, or any combination of them. Provided, however, an adult may not be imprisoned for contempt of court unless found guilty by a jury of his peers who recommend imprisonment as punishment. An adult sentenced to a term of imprisonment under this section may earn good time credits pursuant to Section 24-13-210 and work credits pursuant to Section 24-13-230 and may participate in a work/punishment program pursuant to Section 24-13-910. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----